Maryland, session 2026, HB1424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1110.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Community sewerage system” means a publicly or privately owned
sewerage system that serves at least two lots.
(3) “Controlling authority” means a unit of government, a body public and
corporate, or an intercounty agency authorized by the State, a county, or a municipal
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1424*

HOUSE BILL 1424
corporation to provide for the management, operation, and maintenance of a community
sewerage system, shared facility, or multiuse sewerage system.
(4) “Shared facility” means a sewerage system that:
(i) Serves more than one:
1. Lot and is owned in common by the users;
2. Condominium unit and is owned in common by the users
or by a condominium association;
3. User and is located on individual lots owned by the users;
or
4. User on one lot and is owned in common by the users;
(ii) Is located wholly or partly on any of the common elements of a
condominium; or
(iii) Serves a housing cooperative or other multiple ownership
cooperative.
(b) This section may not be construed as requiring a local jurisdiction to:
(1) Be a controlling authority; or
(2) Authorize or allow the use of a shared facility or a community sewerage
system within the local jurisdiction.
(c) A shared facility or community sewerage system may be approved only if the
system:
(1) Is managed, operated, and maintained by:
(i) A controlling authority; or
(ii) A third party under contract with the controlling authority; and
(2) Discharges:
(i) To the surface waters of the State in accordance with a permit
issued under § 9–323 of this title;
(ii) By way of land application under a nutrient management plan
required under § 8–803.1 of the Agriculture Article that assures 100% of the nitrogen and
phosphorus in the applied effluent will be taken up by vegetation; or

HOUSE BILL 1424 3
(iii) By way of an on–site sewerage system.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(2) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY MANAGE, OPERATE, AND
MAINTAIN A SHARED FACILITY OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM AS A
CONTROLLING AUTHORITY IF:
(I) THE SHARED FACILITY OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM
WAS IN:
1. OPERATION BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026; AND
2. FULL OPERATIONAL COMPLIANCE FOR AT LEAST 6
MONTHS BEFORE THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION BECAME THE CONTROLLING
AUTHORITY;
(II) THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION:
1. CHARGES A MANDATORY USER ASSESSMENT FOR
SEWER SERVICE; AND
2. ESTABLISHES A CAPITAL RESERVE FUND THAT IS
FUNDED TO AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE ESTIMATED COSTS OF
REPLACEMENT OF THE SHARED FACILITY OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM; AND
(III) ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, THE DEPARTMENT, AND THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION APPROVE THE TRANSFER OF RESPONSIBILITY TO THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS A CONTROLLING AUTHORITY.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DIRECT THE MARYLAND
ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE TO TAKE CHARGE OF AND OPERATE A SHARED FACILITY
OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM THAT IS TRANSFERRED TO A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION AS A CONTROLLING AUTHORITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IF THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION:
1. IS UNABLE TO FULFILL THE OBLIGATIONS OF A
CONTROLLING AUTHORITY; AND
2. FAILS TO COMPLY WITH AN ORDER BY THE
SECRETARY TO CORRECT ANY OPERATIONAL DEFICIENCIES IN THE SHARED
FACILITY OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 1424
(II) ANY COSTS INCURRED BY THE MARYLAND
ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE FOR THE MANAGEMENT, OPERATION, AND
MAINTENANCE OF A SHARED FACILITY OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CHARGED TO THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION OR THE INDIVIDUAL LOT OWNERS AND PAID, COLLECTED, AND
ENFORCED AS PROVIDED IN § 3–109 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.